src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-dullwnz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - dullõnz: # adjectives 227 'eng /est peast segi/fin' - full paradigm
     dullõnz+A+Sg+Nom: dullõnz
     dullõnz+A+Sg+Gen: dullõn
     dullõnz+A+Sg+Par: dullõnt
     dullõnz+A+Sg+Dat: dullõnõn
     dullõnz+A+Sg+Ins: dullõnõks
     dullõnz+A+Sg+Ill: dullõnõ
     dullõnz+A+Sg+Ela: dullõnõst
     dullõnz+A+Pl+Nom: dullõnd
     dullõnz+A+Pl+Gen: dullõnd
     dullõnz+A+Pl+Par: dulliņi
     dullõnz+A+Pl+Dat: dullõndõn
     dullõnz+A+Pl+Ins: dullõndõks
     dullõnz+A+Pl+Ill: dulliņiž
     dullõnz+A+Pl+Ela: dulliņist
